California, session 20252026, SB1062.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1927.8 of the Fish and Game Code is amended to read:1927.8. (a) Beginning in 2026, and at least every two years thereafter, the commission shall review the status of the western Joshua tree and the effectiveness of the conservation plan in conserving the species at a public meeting to be held prior to August 31. Concurrent with each review conducted pursuant to this section, the department shall make recommendations to the commission, as necessary, for amendments to the conservation plan to ensure the conservation of the western Joshua tree.(b) The department shall annually adjust the fees provided for in Section 1927.3 pursuant to Section 713. By December 31, 2026, and every three years thereafter, the department shall adopt and subsequently amend regulations pursuant to Section 702 adjusting the fees as necessary to ensure the conservation of the species. The department shall consider making the fees proportionate to the impact of a project and the use of tiered fees by project type, size, or other criteria. The department shall utilize total cost accounting when determining the adequacy of the fees for ensuring conservation of the species, including ensuring sufficient funds for land acquisition or conservation easement costs, monitoring costs, restoration costs, transaction costs, and the amount of endowments for land management or easement stewardship costs consistent with Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 65965) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code and Part 7 (commencing with Section 18501) of Division 9 of the Probate Code.